Oklahoma, session 2026, SB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1289.31 of Title 21, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Firearm” shall have the same definition as provided in
Section 1289.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. “Firearm suppressor” means any device designed, made, or
adapted to muffle the report of a firearm that is being discharged;
3. “Generic and insignificant part” means an item that has
manufacturing or consumer product applications other than inclusion

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB124 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

in a firearm suppressor. The term includes, but is not limited to,
a spring, screw, nut, or pin; and
4. “Manufacture” means forging, casting, machining, or another
process for working a material.
B. 1. A firearm suppressor that is manufactured in this state
and remains in this state shall not be subject to federal law or
federal regulation including registration under the authority of the
United States Congress to regulate interstate commerce.
2. A basic material from which a firearm suppressor is
manufactured in this state, including unmachined steel, is not a
firearm suppressor and is not subject to federal regulation under
the authority of the United States Congress to regulate interstate
commerce as if it were a firearm suppressor.
3. A firearm suppressor manufactured and sold in this state
must have the words “Made in Oklahoma” clearly stamped, machined, or
engraved on it.
C. For purposes of this section, a firearm suppressor is
manufactured in this state if the item is manufactured:
1. In this state from basic materials;
2. Without the inclusion of any part imported from another
state other than a generic and insignificant part as defined in this
section; and


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB124 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Without regard to whether a firearm imported into this state
from another state is attached to or used in conjunction with the
suppressor.
D. No agency, municipality, or other political subdivision
shall adopt a rule, order, ordinance, or policy under which the
entity enforces any regulation that purports to regulate a firearm
suppressor if the statute, order, rule, or regulation imposes a
prohibition, restriction, or other regulation that does not exist
under the laws of this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS













SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB124 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)